Wyoming, session 2026, HB0139.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H) by creating a new
subdivision (XI) and 39-15-103(a)(i)(E) are amended to
read:

37-1-101. Definitions.

HB0139

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0370
(a) As used in chapters 1, 2, 3, 12, 17 and 18 of
this title:

(vi) "Public utility" means and includes every
person that owns, operates, leases, controls or has power
to operate, lease or control:

(H) None of the provisions of this chapter
shall apply to:

(XI) The retail sale of electricity by
a person who is not otherwise regulated as a public utility
under this title, a cooperative electric utility defined in
W.S. 37-17-101(a)(i) or a utility owned and operated by a
municipality, to:

(1) One (1) customer within the
certificated service territory of a public utility,
excluding a cooperative electric utility as defined by W.S.
37-17-101(a)(i) or a utility owned and operated by a
municipality;

HB0139

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0370
(2) Not more than four (4)
customers with a total combined electric load of not less
than five (5) megawatts within the certificated service
territory of a public utility, excluding a cooperative
electric utility as defined by W.S. 37-17-101(a)(i) or a
utility owned and operated by a municipality; or

(3) Not more than four (4)
customers within the certificated service territory of a
public utility, subject to all of the following:

a. The customers submit an
application for new or additional electric service to the
certificated public utility;

b. The public utility does
not respond to the customer's request with an evaluation of
the request within six (6) months or the public utility
determines that the public utility is unable to provide the
requested service within one (1) year of the request or
within another period as agreed upon by the public utility
and the customer;

HB0139

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0370
c. The public utility and
the customer cannot agree to a tariff, agreement or
electric service agreement as provided in W.S. 37-3-116.

39-15-103. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) Except as provided by W.S. 39-15-105, there
is levied an excise tax upon:

(E) The sales price paid to public
utilities as defined in W.S. 37-1-101 through 37-3-114 and
to persons furnishing gas, electricity or heat for
domestic, industrial or commercial consumption, including
persons that sell electricity and are not regulated as a
public utility as provided in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(XI);

Section 2. This act shall apply to all tariffs,
contracts and other agreements entered into on and after
the effective date of this act. Nothing in this act shall
be construed to alter, amend or impair any agreement
entered into before the effective date of this act,
HB0139

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0370
provided that nothing shall prohibit an electric customer
or public utility from entering into or renewing an
agreement, contract or tariff after the effective date of
this act for the agreement, contract or tariff to conform
with this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0139